Washington statutes.
RCW 43.133.030

Sunrise notes—Procedure.

The office of financial management and the department of commerce shall, in cooperation with appropriate legislative committees and legislative staff, establish a procedure for the provision of sunrise notes on the expected impact of bills and resolutions that authorize the creation of new boards and new types of special purpose districts.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2060; 1995 c 399 s 81; 1987 c 342 s 3.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.